Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201287-303.03
Attorney General;
additional powers.

(1) The Attorney General, in
addition to other powers conferred upon him or her by the Uniform Deceptive
Trade Practices Act:

(a) May issue subpoenas to require the attendance
of witnesses or the production of documents, administer oaths, conduct hearings
in aid of any investigation or inquiry, and prescribe such forms and adopt
and promulgate such rules as may be necessary to administer the act; and

(b) May issue
a cease and desist order, with or without prior hearing, against any person
engaged in activities in violation of the act, directing such person to cease
and desist from such activity.

(2) Service
of any notice or subpoena may be made in the manner prescribed by the rules
of civil procedure.

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB781, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB801, § 6.